apertium-epo-fra.epo.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÃÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÕŒÙÚÛÜàáâäãçèéêëìíîïñòóôöõœøùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZĈĜĤĴŜŬabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzĉĝĥĵŝŭąĄčČćĆđĐęĘłŁŀĿńŃőŐřšŠśŚžŽźŹżŻÆæØøÅåăĂşșȘțȚıİğĞ</alphabet>

  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="acc" />
    <sdef n="nom" />
    <sdef n="past" />
    <sdef n="qnt" />
    <sdef n="ord" />
    <sdef n="obj" />
    <sdef n="dat" />
    <sdef n="subj" />
    <sdef n="pro" />
    <sdef n="tn" />
    <sdef n="acr" />
    <sdef n="loc" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="al" />
    <sdef n="n" />
    <sdef n="np" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="pref" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="m" />
    <sdef n="mf" />
    <sdef n="sg" />
    <sdef n="pl" />
    <sdef n="sp" />
    <sdef n="ND" />
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="preadv" />
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="prn" />
    <sdef n="rel" />
    <sdef n="ind" />
    <sdef n="itg" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="dem" />
    <sdef n="def" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" />
    <sdef n="cnjadv" />
    <sdef n="nt" />
    <sdef n="vbser" />
    <sdef n="vblex" />
    <sdef n="vbtr" />
    <sdef n="vbntr" />
    <sdef n="vbtr_ntr" />
    <sdef n="igi" />
    <sdef n="inf" />
    <sdef n="ger" />
    <sdef n="gerpast" />
    <sdef n="pp" />
    <sdef n="ppres" />
    <sdef n="pp2" />
    <sdef n="pp3" />
    <sdef n="pri" />
    <sdef n="p1" />
    <sdef n="p2" />
    <sdef n="p3" />
    <sdef n="fti" />
    <sdef n="fts" />
    <sdef n="cni" />
    <sdef n="imp" />
    <sdef n="pos" />
    <sdef n="ref" />
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="percent" />
    <sdef n="ciph" />
    <sdef n="ij" />
    <sdef n="sent" />
    <sdef n="cm" />
    <sdef n="cit" />
    <sdef n="lcit" />
    <sdef n="rcit" />
    <sdef n="lpar" />
    <sdef n="rpar" />
    <sdef n="lquest" />
    <sdef n="pres" />
    <sdef n="guio" />
    <sdef n="apos" />
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="ö">
      <e><p><l>ö</l>                <r>ö</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>oe</l>        <r>ö</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ü">
      <e><p><l>ü</l>                <r>ü</r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ue</l>        <r>ü</r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="o__n" c="autoconcord:sengenra,sgpl">
      <e><p><l>o</l>                <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oj</l>               <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>on</l>               <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojn</l>              <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r>o<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>a</l>         <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>aj</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>an</l>        <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ajn</l>       <r>o<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="oj__n" c="autoconcord:sengenra,pl">
      <e><p><l>oj</l>               <r>oj<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojn</l>              <r>oj<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="a__adj">
      <e><p><l>a</l>                <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aj</l>               <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l>               <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajn</l>              <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>e</l>         <r>a<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pr__adj"> <!-- adjektivaj esprimoj enkondukitaj per prepozicio -->
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="aj__adj">
      <e><p><l>aj</l>               <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ajn</l>              <r>a<s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>a<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="eks__pref"> <!-- prefiksoj -->
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="pref"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="eks__adv">
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="e__adv">
      <e><p><l>e</l>                <r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nomacc">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>n</l>                <r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="nomacc0">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sgpl">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>j</l>                <r><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="BBC__n">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sp"/></r></p><par n="nomacc0"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="n-r/o__n">
      <e><p><l>o</l>                <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>on</l>               <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>oj</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>ojn</l>       <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ges-r/oj__n">
      <e><p><l>oj</l>               <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ojn</l>              <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="acr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="adiós__ij">
      <e><p><l></l>                 <r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="guionet">
      <e><p><l>-</l>                <r>-<s n="guio"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><p><l>,</l>                <r>,<s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>&quot;</l>           <r>&quot;<s n="cit"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="cometa">
      <e><p><l>'</l>                <r>'<s n="apos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="antaŭ">                          <i>antaŭ</i><par n="eks__pref"/></e>
    <e lm="aŭstrali">                       <i>aŭstrali</i><par n="eks__pref"/></e>
    <e lm="bravisime">                      <i>bravisime</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bukolika">                       <i>bukolik</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="Co">                             <i>Co</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="D">                              <i>D</i><par n="ö"/><i>rler</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
    <e lm="dancareno">                      <i>dancaren</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diplomatie">                     <i>diplomati</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dukotiledonaj">                  <i>dukotiledon</i><par n="aj__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="duon">                           <i>duon</i><par n="eks__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="efemeridoj">                     <i>efemerid</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
    <e r="RL" lm="dudek dua">               <p><l>dudekdu</l><r>dudek<b/>du</r></p><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="f-ino">                          <i>f-in</i><par n="n-r/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="flavaj">                         <i>flav</i><par n="aj__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ftp">                            <i>ftp</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gallo">                          <i>gallo</i><par n="eks__pref"/></e>
    <e lm="gavialedo">                      <i>gavialed</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gebofiloj">                      <i>gebofil</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gefratoj">                       <i>gefrat</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ges-roj">                        <i>ges-r</i><par n="ges-r/oj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="he">                             <i>he</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="helvete">                        <i>helvet</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="inter">                          <i>inter</i><par n="eks__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="interferaj">                     <i>interfer</i><par n="aj__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="interferaj franĝoj">             <i>interferaj<b/>franĝ</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Jürgen">                         <i>J</i><par n="ü"/><i>rgen</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Jürgen Trumpf">                  <i>J</i><par n="ü"/><i>rgen<b/>Trumpf</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="kanad">                          <i>kanad</i><par n="eks__pref"/></e>
    <e lm="kepleraj">                       <i>kepler</i><par n="aj__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kia embaraso">                   <i>kia<b/>embaraso</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="kolumno">                        <i>kolumn</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kontraŭtanka">                   <i>kontraŭtank</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kritike">                        <i>kritik</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kun">                            <i>kun</i><par n="eks__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kun karno kaj ostoj">            <i>kun<b/>karno<b/>kaj<b/>ostoj</i><par n="pr__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mnemoniko">                      <i>mnemonik</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="MS-DOS">                         <i>MS-DOS</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neglektinde">                    <i>neglektind</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="norma">                          <i>norm</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="n-ro">                           <i>n-r</i><par n="n-r/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="por">                            <i>por</i><par n="eks__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Pöttering">                      <i>P</i><par n="ö"/><i>ttering</i><par n="Smith__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Prerioj">                        <i>Preri</i><par n="oj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="re">                             <i>re</i><par n="adiós__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="ses">                            <i>ses</i><par n="eks__pref"/></e>
    <e lm="s-ino">                          <i>s-in</i><par n="n-r/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="somera">                         <i>somer</i><par n="a__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="s-ro">                           <i>s-r</i><par n="n-r/o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="s-roj">                          <i>s-r</i><par n="ges-r/oj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sub">                            <i>sub</i><par n="eks__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="talpo">                          <i>talp</i><par n="o__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tanĝante">                       <i>tanĝant</i><par n="e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="Tönis">                          <i>T</i><par n="ö"/><i>nis</i><par n="Mark__np"/></e>
    <e lm="URL">                            <i>URL</i><par n="BBC__n"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="coma"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="cometa"/></e>
    <e>                                     <par n="guionet"/></e>
